Louisiana, session 2026, SB291.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:141 through 154, 156, 157, and 158 are hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
§141. Policy and definitions
A. In order The legislature finds that the practice of architecture by
qualified individuals with professional expertise is necessary to safeguard life,
health, and property and to promote the public welfare, the practice of architecture
in this state is reserved to those persons who have the proper qualifications and have
been registered by the board.
B. The legislature further finds that the practice of architecture by
individuals and firms should be regulated in the public interest.
C. Therefore, it is the legislative intent and the purpose of this Chapter
to promote, preserve, and protect the public health, safety, and welfare by
regulating the practice of architecture and ensuring that any individual or firm
practicing or offering to practice architecture shall be registered with and
licensed by the board before engaging in the practice. In furtherance of this
purpose, this Chapter creates the State Board of Architectural Examiners
whose members, authority, functions, and procedures shall be established in
Page 1 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 291 ENROLLED
accordance with the provisions of this Chapter. This Chapter shall be liberally
construed to carry out these objectives and purposes.
D. As used in this Chapter:
(1) "Applicant" means an individual who seeks a license in accordance
with the process set forth by the board.
(2) "Approved educational program" means an educational program for
architecture that is accepted by the board.
(3) "Approved examination" means an examination for architecture that
is accepted by the board.
(4) "Approved experience program" means an experience program for
architecture that is accepted by the board.
(5) "Architect" means a person who is technically and legally qualified to
practice architecture an individual currently licensed by the board who
demonstrates competence to engage in the practice of architecture as provided
in this Chapter.
(2)(6) "Board" means the State Board of Architectural Examiners.
(7) "Competence" means the knowledge, experience, and skill required
by an architect for the practice of architecture in accordance with the accepted
standard of care.
(8) "Firm" means any legally formed business entity registered with the
board through which architectural services are provided.
(9) "Jurisdiction" means any state, commonwealth, the District of
Columbia, or other insular territory of the United States.
(10) "License" means an approval granted by the board to an individual
or a firm to engage in the practice of architecture.
(11) "Licensing authority" means the public board, agency, or body
which has been authorized by a jurisdiction's governing authority to grant
licenses and regulate the practice of architecture in that jurisdiction.
(12) "NCARB" means the National Council of Architectural
Registration Boards.
Page 2 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 291 ENROLLED
(13) "Person" means any individual, firm, partnership, association, joint
venture, cooperative, corporation, or other group or combination acting in
concert.
(3)(14) The "practice of architecture" is the rendering or offering of the
services specified in this Paragraph in connection with the design, construction,
enlargement, or alteration of a building, a group of buildings, or the space within and
surrounding buildings which have human occupancy or habitation as their principal
purpose. Such services shall include the following: planning; providing preliminary
studies, designs, drawings, specifications, and other technical submissions;
administration of construction contracts; and the coordination of any element of
technical submissions prepared by others, including but not limited to engineers and
landscape architects, as appropriate. The practice of architecture shall not include the
practice of engineering as defined in R.S. 37:682; however, a registered architect
may perform such engineering work as is incidental to the practice of architecture.
(15) "Responsible control" means responsibility for exercising the
ultimate authority over, and possessing the knowledge and ability to oversee,
delegate, and integrate the design and technical decisions related to the
preparation of the project's instruments of service and the project's
implementation in conformance with the standard of care.
(16) "Technical submissions" means the documents necessary to
demonstrate compliance with applicable regulatory requirements or to
fabricate or construct a project including but not limited to drawings,
specifications, performance criteria, and installation requirements.
C.E. The definition of the practice of architecture set forth in Paragraph B(3)
(D)(14) of this Section may include, but shall not be construed as precluding
nonlicensed persons from performing the following services: project development;,
feasibility studies;, planning;, energy consumption analysis;, and interior design.
§142. Board appointed by governor; removal
A.(1) The State Board of Architectural Examiners is hereby created within
the office of the governor and shall consist of seven members, five of whom shall be
Page 3 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 291 ENROLLED
architects selected by the governor as provided for in Subsection B of this Section,
one selected by the governor as provided for in Subsection C of this Section, and
one selected by the governor as provided for in Subsection D of this Section. All
nominees and appointees shall be domiciled in the state of Louisiana. The five
architect members shall be appointed, one each, from the five districts provided for
in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection. The governor has the right to remove any or all
members of the board for inefficiency or neglect of duty.
(2) The districts shall be composed as follows:
(a) District 1: Orleans, Plaquemines, and St. Bernard.
(b) District 2: Assumption, Jefferson, Lafourche, St. Charles, St. James, St.
John the Baptist, St. Tammany, Terrebonne, and Washington.
(c) District 3: Ascension, East Baton Rouge, East Feliciana, Iberville,
Livingston, St. Helena, St. Martin, Tangipahoa, West Baton Rouge, and West
Feliciana.
(d) District 4: Acadia, Allen, Avoyelles, Beauregard, Calcasieu, Cameron,
Evangeline, Grant, Iberia, Jefferson Davis, Lafayette, Natchitoches, Pointe Coupee,
Rapides, Sabine, St. Landry, St. Mary, Vermilion, and Vernon.
(e) District 5: Bienville, Bossier, Caddo, Caldwell, Catahoula, Claiborne,
Concordia, DeSoto, East Carroll, Franklin, Jackson, LaSalle, Lincoln, Madison,
Morehouse, Ouachita, Red River, Richland, Tensas, Union, Webster, West Carroll,
and Winn.
(3) Changes by the legislature in the composition of any of the districts
provided for in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection made after an appointment of
a member to the board shall not affect an appointment in any way, and any
member lawfully appointed prior to such changes shall be allowed to serve the
full term for which the member was appointed.
B.(1) The five architect members shall be and shall remain domiciled in this
state and in the district from which he the member is nominated and appointed.
Each shall be a licensed architect and shall have practiced architecture for at least
seven years. Each architect member shall be appointed by the governor from a list
Page 4 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 291 ENROLLED
of three no more than five nominees elected from each of the five districts. An
eligible architect desiring nomination shall write a letter to the board so stating.
If letters from five or fewer eligible architects are received, no election shall be
held, and the board shall submit the names of all eligible architects who have
sought nomination from the governor for consideration. If letters from more
than five eligible architects are received, an election conducted by the board
shall be held to determine the five eligible architects to be included on the list
of nominees. The board shall not adopt any rule or regulation which imposes further
eligibility requirements for membership on the board.
(2) In order to determine the list of nominees for the architect members, there
shall be a statewide election to elect three no more than five nominees from each
district. Any licensed architect who wishes to be a candidate and have his name
placed on the ballot shall send a letter by certified mail to the director of the board
indicating his intent to be a candidate. The letter shall be accompanied by a
curriculum vitae and shall certify that, if elected, the architect will serve.
(3) The election for nominees shall be by either mail ballot or online voting,
and only one architect shall be a candidate for nomination from the same
architectural firm, corporation, agency, partnership, or other entity. After the
election, the three five candidates from each district who received the highest
numbers of votes shall have their names submitted to the governor as nominees. All
licensed architects residing in this state shall be eligible to vote in the election.
(4) The initial and subsequent elections shall be to fill vacancies as they
occur. The elections shall be completed by the board within ninety days of the
effective vacancy.
C. The governor shall appoint one member of the board who shall be an
architect who for seven years prior to appointment has been employed full time in
architectural education, or who for seven years prior to appointment, has been an
administrator of building design, construction, or design standards for government
at the local, state, or national level.
D. The governor shall appoint one public member of the board who shall be
Page 5 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 291 ENROLLED
a citizen of the United States who is not actively engaged in or retired from the
professions of architecture, engineering, interior design, or landscape architecture,
or the occupation of a contractor, or the design or construction of buildings.
E. Each board member shall at all times maintain eligibility to serve on
the board by avoiding relationships that would interfere with the board's
mission of public protection.
F. No board member shall be an officer or hold any leadership position
in this state's professional association or the national professional association
serving architects for the term of the board member's appointment to the
board.
G. Any vacancy that occurs in the board membership for any reason,
including expiration of a term, removal, resignation, death, disability, or
disqualification, shall be filled as prescribed in this Section in a timely manner
so that the board may fulfill its duties as charged.
H. The board may recommend removal of a board member to the
governor upon an affirmative vote of a majority of members otherwise eligible
to vote upon one or more of the following grounds:
(1) The refusal or inability for any reason of a board member to perform
the duties required of a board member in an efficient, responsible, and
professional manner.
(2) The misuse of a board member's position to obtain, or attempt to
obtain, any financial or material gain, or any advantage personally or for
another, through the office.
(3) A final adjudication by a recognized body, including any court, that
there has been a violation of the laws governing the practice of architecture by
the board member.
(4) Conviction of a felony or misdemeanor other than a minor traffic
offense.
§143. Term of office
A. Each member shall serve six years, or until his successor is duly
Page 6 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 291 ENROLLED
appointed, except the initial educational or regulatory member appointed pursuant
to R.S. 37:142(C) shall serve a term of four years and the initial public member
appointed pursuant to R.S. 37:142(D) shall serve a term of five years and
confirmed.
B. In the event of the death or resignation of any board member, the
appointment by the governor of his successor shall be only for the remainder
of the unexpired term.
C. Each appointment by the governor shall be submitted to the Senate
for confirmation.
D. The board shall advise the governor of the expiration of the term of the
board members. All vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as prescribed for
new members in R.S. 37:142.
§144. Powers, authority, and domicile of board
A. Four members of the board constitute a quorum for the purpose of holding
examinations, meetings and hearings, adjudicating, granting certificates, and
renewing licenses, engaging in rule making, and transacting other business within
the scope of this Chapter.
B. The board shall elect from its members a president, secretary, and
other officers as it deems appropriate and necessary to conduct its business. The
president shall preside at all meetings of the board, sign all certificates of
licensure, and perform those duties customarily associated with the position and
any other duties assigned from by the board. The president may establish board
committees as appropriate and necessary for the furtherance of board business
and may designate or remove board members as committee members.
C. The secretary shall be the official custodian of the records of the
board, sign minutes of the board meetings, sign the president's certificates of
licensure, and perform the duties of the president when the president is unable
to do so.
D. The board may delegate authority to its executive director as is
customary and necessary to properly fulfill the board's duties. The executive
Page 7 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 291 ENROLLED
director shall perform such administrative and ministerial duties as the board
authorizes.
E. The certificate of issuance of a license by the board to an individual or
a firm shall entitle the holder to practice as an architect architecture in Louisiana.
C.F. The board shall have the power powers and duties as may be
necessary to carry out the purposes and enforce any provision of this Chapter
and any rule promulgated by the board, including granting and renewing
licenses, regulating individuals and firms engaged in the practice of
architecture, establishing by rule the requirements and procedures for use of
the title "Architect Emeritus". The board shall also have the power to adopt and
amend such rules and regulations as are reasonably necessary for the proper
performance of its duties, for carrying out the purposes of this Chapter, for
continuing education, for the regulation of the proceedings before it, and for the
regulation of the practice of architecture under the laws of this state.
D.G. The procedure for the adoption, amendment, and repeal of any rule or
regulation shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, R.S. 49:950
et seq., and the rules and regulations which may be adopted by the board shall be
available for public inspection at the office of the State Board of Architectural
Examiners.
E.H. The board may employ executive, clerical, or other and office assistants
as are necessary, including an executive director, for the proper performance of its
work; may make expenditures from its funds for any purpose which is reasonably
necessary for the proper performance of its duties under this Chapter; and may, if
necessary, or upon advice of the attorney general, hire counsel for advice, for the
representation of the board against violators of this Chapter and for the defense of
any action brought against the board or its members or staff.
F.I. The domicile of the board shall be Baton Rouge, Louisiana.
J. The board, its members, and its agents shall be immune from personal
liability for actions taken in good faith in the discharge of the board's
responsibilities. The state shall hold the board, its members, and its agents
Page 8 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 291 ENROLLED
harmless from all costs, damages, and attorney fees arising from claims and
suits against them with respect to matters to which the immunity applies.
G.K.(1) The board may allocate up to ten percent of all license renewal and
delinquent fees each fiscal year to a fund to be named the Louisiana Architecture
Education and Research Fund. The purpose of the fund is to better prepare students
for internships and future careers as architects by authorizing the board to make
awards to universities in this state accredited by and in good standing with the
National Architectural Accrediting Board (NAAB).
(2) The fund shall be used exclusively for one or more of the following in
order to improve architectural education and the licensure of student interns in this
state:
(a) Integration of practice and education in the professional NAAB degree
curriculum.
(b) Implementation of a path to licensure resulting in an architectural license
at the time of graduation from a NAAB-accredited professional degree program.
(c) Facilitation of enrollment and completion of training requirements for the
Intern Development Program (IDP) approved experience program as administered
by the National Council of Architectural Registration Boards (NCARB).
(d) Assistance of students and interns in preparation for the taking of the
Architectural Registration Exam (ARE) approved examination.
(e) Methods for raising awareness of the responsibilities of architects and of
the ways that public health, safety, and welfare are impacted by architects.
(3) An accredited university architectural program shall submit an annual
proposal and budget, including any information deemed necessary by the board, to
be considered for any award from the board.
(4) The board shall submit an annual report to the appropriate legislative
oversight committee regarding its allocation of monies from the fund for the
preceding fiscal year.
§145. Architects; requirements for; certificate license; continuing education
A. No person shall practice architecture in this state or use the title
Page 9 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 291 ENROLLED
"architect", or any term derived therefrom, or display or use any title, sign,
advertisement, or other device to indicate that such the person practices or offers to
practice architecture, or renders architectural services, or is an architect, unless such
the person shall have has registered with and secured from the board a certificate
of registration and license in the manner hereinafter provided, and shall thereafter
comply with the provisions of the laws of the state of Louisiana governing the
registration and licensing of architects and architectural firms.
B. Persons licensed by the board to practice architecture may, by rule of the
board, be required to earn annually up to twelve hours of board-approved continuing
education pertaining to building design in connection with public health, safety, or
welfare. The board may, by rule, establish procedures and requirements for
continuing education by an architect to demonstrate continuing competence in
the practice of architecture for the protection of the public. The requirements
shall include a description of acceptable activities and appropriate
documentation required for license renewal.
§146. Examination before board; Initial license qualifications
A. Unless previously registered and currently licensed on September 1, 1972,
no person shall practice architecture until he has passed an examination approved by
the board.
B. For the purpose of qualifying for the examination, the applicant shall
present satisfactory evidence to the board that he:
(1) Is of good moral character.
(2) Has paid his debt to society if he has ever been convicted of a felony.
(3) Holds a professional degree from a school whose curriculum has been
accredited by the National Architectural Accrediting Board.
(4) Is enrolled in the Intern Development Program administered by the
National Council of Architectural Registration Boards.
C. Any applicant not the holder of a first professional degree from a school
whose curriculum has been accredited by the National Architectural Accrediting
Board may take the examination if he has done all of the following:
Page 10 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 291 ENROLLED
(1) Has made formal application for examination to the board prior to April
1, 1984; and
(2) Has completed all of the education equivalency requirements for
qualifying for the examination as delineated in the National Council of Architectural
Registration Boards' "Circular of Information Number One"; and
(3) Has furnished evidence to the board that he has had practical architectural
work experience, requirements for which are delineated by the National Council of
Architectural Registration Boards or the board.
D. The board may adopt rules and regulations in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act governing the approval, selection, administration,
participation, and completion of the examination and the Intern Development
Program.
A. To obtain an initial license to practice architecture in Louisiana, an
applicant shall satisfy all of the following requirements:
(1) Provide documentation satisfactory to the board that the applicant
has successfully completed all of the following:
(a) An approved education program.
(b) An approved experience program.
(c) An approved examination.
(2) Submit to the board a completed application and pay the required
fee.
(3) Paid restitution if the applicant has ever been convicted of a felony.
B. Any of the following acts may preclude an applicant's eligibility as a
candidate for initial licensure:
(1) Conviction by any court for the commission of any felony.
(2) Conviction by any court of a misdemeanor involving fraud, deceit, or
misrepresentation.
(3) Misstatement or misrepresentation of fact by the applicant in
connection with the applicant's application for registration in this state or
another jurisdiction.
Page 11 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 291 ENROLLED
(4) Violation of any of the rules of conduct required of applicants or
architects as adopted by the board.
(5) Practicing architecture, or holding oneself out as capable of
practicing architecture, in this state in violation of this Chapter.
§147. Rules governing examinations Reciprocal license qualifications
A. The board will make all necessary rules and regulations governing the
time, place, and method of conducting examinations and the grading of them, and
prescribe the types of examinations to be given. The examination shall consist of
technical and professional subjects that the board may prescribe.
B. Copies of board examinations and answers of applicants shall be
maintained for one year. The board examinations and the answers of applicants shall
be exempt from disclosure pursuant to the Public Records Law as provided for in
R.S. 44:1 et seq.
To obtain a reciprocal license to practice architecture in Louisiana, an
applicant shall satisfy both of the following requirements:
(1) Provide documentation satisfactory to the board that the applicant
holds both of the following:
(a) A current and valid license issued by another jurisdiction or licensing
authority recognized by the board.
(b) A current NCARB certificate.
(2) Submit to the board a completed application and pay the required
fee.
§148. Examinations; persons exempt Firm regulation
A. Upon application and the payment of a fee equivalent to that required for
written examination and certificate and upon certification issued by the National
Council of Architectural Registration Boards, the board may issue a certificate of
registration and license to practice the profession of architecture in this state to any
person who has passed a standard National Council of Architectural Registration
Boards' examination if such examination is equivalent to that prescribed by the
board.
Page 12 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 291 ENROLLED
B. The board may review the examination referred to in this section to
determine and decide whether the examination is equivalent to that prescribed by the
board.
C. The board may also require that the applicant under this section submit
other proper evidence of his ability to engage in the practice of architecture and
evidence of his continued honorable professional conduct after passing the
examination before the National Council of Architectural Registration Boards.
To offer or perform architectural services as a firm in this state, a legally
formed business entity shall meet the rule requirements adopted by the board.
§149. Fees
The applicant shall pay the actual cost of the examination. Upon passing all
divisions of the examination, a fee to be determined by the board, not to exceed two
hundred dollars, shall be charged to an individual domiciled in this state for
issuing a becoming registered and obtaining an initial license to practice
architecture in this state. A registration fee to be determined by the board, not to
exceed five hundred dollars, shall be charged to an individual domiciled outside
Louisiana seeking to be for becoming registered and obtaining an initial or
reciprocal license to practice architecture in Louisiana. A fee to be determined by
the board, not to exceed three hundred dollars, shall be charged to any corporation,
professional architectural corporation as defined in R.S. 12:1086, architectural-
engineering corporation as defined in R.S. 12:1171, or partnership, limited liability
partnership, limited liability company, association, sole proprietorship, or other
entity seeking to obtain a certificate of authority firm for becoming registered and
obtaining an initial license to practice architecture in Louisiana, unless such entity
the firm is exempted exempt from the fee by the rules of the board. The board may
not increase the fee for issuing a charged to an individual or firm domiciled in
Louisiana for becoming registered and obtaining an initial or reciprocal license
or a certificate of authority by more than thirty dollars during any three-year period,
and the board may not increase the registration fee charged to an individual or firm
domiciled outside of Louisiana seeking to be for becoming registered and obtaining
Page 13 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 291 ENROLLED
an initial or reciprocal license in Louisiana by more than fifty dollars during any
three-year period.
§150. Renewal of license; renewal fees
A. Every licensed architect domiciled in this state who desires to continue his
license in force shall submit to the board a completed application and annually
pay, during the month of November or December, a fee to be determined by the
board, not to exceed two hundred dollars. Upon certification of completion of the
continuing education requirement set forth by the board in its rules and
payment of the renewal fee, the secretary of the board shall issue him the licensee
a renewal certificate license for the year due. The board may decline to renew a
license if the architect's continuing education activities do not meet the
standards set forth in the board's rules.
B. Every licensed architect domiciled outside Louisiana who desires to
continue his license in force in Louisiana shall submit to the board a completed
application and annually pay, during the month of November or December, a
renewal registration fee to be determined by the board, not to exceed five hundred
dollars. Upon certification of completion of the continuing education
requirements set forth by the board in its rules and payment of the renewal fee,
the secretary of the board shall issue him the licensee a renewal certificate license
for the year due. The board may decline to renew a license if the architect's
continuing education activities do not meet the standards set forth in the
board's rules.
C. The An architect's failure to renew his license in proper time shall by the
designated renewal date shall result in the expiration of the architect's license.
This expiration shall not deprive the architect of the right of renewal thereafter. The
delinquent fee to be paid upon the renewal of a license by an architect domiciled in
Louisiana at any time after the month of December in the year when such renewal
fee first became due shall be determined by the board, not to exceed two hundred
dollars. This delinquent fee shall be in addition to the renewal registration fee set
forth in Subsection A of this Section.
Page 14 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 291 ENROLLED
D. The delinquent fee to be paid upon the renewal of a license by an architect
domiciled outside Louisiana at any time after the month of December in the year
when such renewal fee first became due shall be determined by the board, not to
exceed five hundred dollars. This delinquent fee shall be in addition to the renewal
registration fee set forth in Subsection B of this Section.
E. Every corporation, professional architectural corporation as defined in R.S.
12:1086, architectural-engineering corporation as defined in R.S. 12:1171, or any
partnership, limited liability partnership, limited liability company, association, sole
proprietorship, or other entity seeking to firm desiring to continue its license in
force in Louisiana shall renew its certificate of authority license in Louisiana shall
and, unless exempted by the board, annually pay a renewal fee to be determined by
the board, not to exceed three hundred dollars, during the month of May or June.
The board shall issue a renewal certificate of authority license for the year upon
receipt of the completed renewal application and renewal fee payment.
F.(1) The delinquency delinquent fee to be paid by any corporation,
professional architectural corporation as defined in R.S. 12:1086, any architectural-
engineering corporation as defined in R.S. 12:1171, or any partnership, limited
liability partnership, limited liability company, association, sole proprietorship, or
other entity firm, when the renewal fee set forth in Subsection E of this Section is
paid at any time after June in the year the fee first became due, shall be determined
by the board, not to exceed three hundred dollars.
(2) The payment of any delinquency delinquent fee shall be paid in addition
to the annual renewal fee set forth in Subsection E of this Section.
G. The board may not increase the renewal fees or the delinquency
delinquent fees set forth in this Section by more than thirty dollars during any three-
year period.
§151. Roster of architects to be published annually
The board shall publish annually a roster of registered architects with their
addresses. This published roster shall be received as evidence in court that the names
it contains are duly registered architects of this state as of a specific date on the roster
Page 15 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 291 ENROLLED
maintain on its website a public, searchable roster for verification of licensure,
which shall contain the name, license number, license status, initial licensure
date, current expiration date, and work address of each licensee.
§152. Use of title "architect"; seal or stamp architect seal
A.(1) The name of the architect followed by the title "architect" shall appear
on every publication, announcement, and letterhead used by a person practicing
architecture in connection with his practice.
(2) Every registered architect shall have a seal or stamp. This shall contain
his name, the words "Registered Architect, State of Louisiana," and the architect's
license number an image authorized by the board. All contract drawings and
specifications issued by the architect for use in this state shall be stamped or sealed.
The removal of an architect's seal or stamp, and/or use of an architect's plans, or
both, unless otherwise provided by law or by written approval of the architect, shall
be a violation of this Chapter and shall be subject to the penalties delineated in R.S.
37:154(B) and (D).
B. Except in the cases contemplated by R.S. 38:2317, no architect shall affix
his seal or stamp or permit it to be affixed to any specification, drawing, or other
related document which was not prepared either by him the architect or under his
the architect's responsible supervision control. In those cases contemplated by R.S.
38:2317, the design professional reviewing state-owned plans, designs,
specifications, or other construction documents shall remove the stamp or seal of the
original architect and shall affix his stamp or seal to those documents that he the
professional has reviewed and approved for reuse. The design professional affixing
his stamp or seal to documents approved for reuse shall assume all responsibilities
for the documents which bear his stamp or the professional's seal. No architect shall
use his seal or stamp or do any other act as an architect unless he the architect is at
the time duly registered and licensed.
§153. Board; disciplinary actions; revocation; rescission; suspension; probation;
reprimand; admonishment; fine
A. The board may participate in a proceeding to revoke, rescind, or suspend
Page 16 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 291 ENROLLED
the certificate of, registration or license, or both, place on probation, reprimand,
admonish, or fine in an amount not to exceed five thousand dollars per violation, any
individual or firm registrant or certificate holder licensee found by the board to
have committed any of the following acts:
(1) Engaging in any fraud, deceit, gross incompetence, dishonesty,
misrepresentation, misconduct, or gross negligence in the practice of architecture
material misstatement, perjury, or giving any false or forged evidence in
applying for a license, taking an examination, or in applying for any renewal
license provided for in this Chapter.
(2) Engaging in any fraud, deceit, gross incompetence, dishonesty,
material misrepresentation, misconduct, or gross negligence in the practice of
architecture.
(3) Affixing his the licensee's seal, stamp, or name to any specification,
drawing or other related document which was not prepared by him the licensee or
under his the licensee's responsible supervision and control, or permitting his the
licensee's seal, stamp, or name to be affixed to any such document.
(3)(4) Using his the licensee's seal or stamp or engaging in any other act
constituting the practice of architecture or violating any order or term of
probation imposed by the board at a time when his the licensee's certificate of
registration or license is rescinded, suspended, or revoked, or at a time when his the
registrant's current renewal has not been obtained in accordance with the law, or
when the license is expired for more than ninety days or in emeritus status.
(4)(5) Conviction of a felony or entry of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere
to a felony charge under the laws of the United States or any state, territory, or
district of the United States, in which case a certified copy of the record of
conviction shall be conclusive evidence of such conviction.
(5)(6) Willfully misleading or defrauding any person employing him the
licensee as an architect.
(7) Knowingly making or signing any false statement, certificate, or
affidavit in connection with the practice of architecture.
Page 17 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 291 ENROLLED
(6) Violating the provisions of this Chapter or any lawful rule or regulation
adopted by the board pursuant to law.
(7) Practicing any fraud, deceit, material misstatement, or perjury in applying
for a certificate of licensure or registration or in taking any examination or in
applying for any renewal certificate provided for in this Chapter.
(8) Being convicted Conviction of any civil or criminal violation crime or
entering entry of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to any criminal charge an
element of which is fraud or which arises out of such individual's practice of
architecture, in which case a certified copy of a record of conviction shall be
conclusive evidence of such conviction.
(9) The refusal of the licensing authority of another state, territory, or district
of the United States to issue or renew a license, permit, or certificate to practice
architecture, or the revocation or suspension or other restriction imposed on a
license, permit, or certificate issued by such licensing authority, on the grounds other
than non-payment of a registration fee, or a finding by such licensing authority
that a person has engaged in the unlicensed practice of architecture; provided
that the reason for the action taken by the other licensing authority was recognized
by the Louisiana board as a ground for the disciplinary action taken.
(10) Providing false testimony before the board.
(11) Failing to provide, within thirty calendar days of mailing the notice
receipt of a request by certified or registered mail, or personal service,
information or documents requested by the executive director as a result of a formal
complaint to the board relating to an alleged alleging a violation of this Chapter.
(12) Using any advertising or solicitation which is false or misleading.
(13) Aiding or assisting another person in violating any provision of this
Chapter or any rule adopted and promulgated by the board.
(14) Declaration of insanity or incompetence by a court of competent
jurisdiction.
(15) Presenting or attempting to use as one's own the license, certificate,
or seal of another person.
Page 18 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 291 ENROLLED
(16) Falsely impersonating any other licensee or certificate holder of a
like or different name.
(17) Violating or not complying with any order, ruling, or decision of the
board.
(18) Violating the provisions of this Chapter or any lawful rule or
regulation adopted by the board pursuant to law.
B. Each day that a violation under Subsection A of this Section occurs shall
may be considered a separate violation.
C. The board may rescind, suspend, refuse to renew, or revoke a certificate
of the registration or license, or both, place on probation, reprimand, admonish,
or fine in an amount not to exceed five thousand dollars per violation, any foreign
or domestic corporation firm as defined in R.S. 37:141(D)(8) if the firm or if one
or more of its officers, directors, employees, agents, or representatives has violated
any of the above provisions of this Section.
D. In addition to any other action, the board may assess all reasonable costs
incurred in connection with a disciplinary proceeding, including investigator fees,
stenographer fees and attorney fees, and court costs as a condition of probation or
reinstatement of any certificate or registration or license rescinded, suspended, or
revoked pursuant to this Section. The assessment of fees and costs may be
considered disciplinary action.
E. The All disciplinary action assessed taken shall be published in the annual
Roster of Architects on the official website and in the official newsletter of the
board and may be released to other professional organizations relating to
architecture or to the news media.
F. Proceedings under this Section shall be begun by any person filing a
written complaint with the board against the registrant or certificate holder licensee
in the form of a sworn affidavit. The board, upon its own motion, may investigate the
actions of any registrant or certificate holder licensee and file a complaint against
him the licensee or registrant.
G. If in the opinion of the board, a hearing is warranted, a time and place for
Page 19 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 291 ENROLLED
the hearing of the charges shall be fixed by the board. A copy of the complaint shall
be sent by the board by registered or certified mail, through electronic means, or
by personal service to the registrant or certificate holder licensee against whom a
complaint has been filed at his last known address by registered or certified mail at
least thirty days prior to the hearing together with a notice of the time and place of
the meeting of the board at which the complaint shall be heard. Notwithstanding the
provisions of this Subsection, the board may summarily suspend a license if it finds
that public health, safety, or welfare imperatively requires emergency action and
incorporates a finding to that effect in its order, as authorized by R.S. 49:977.3(C).
Any summary suspension shall be for a maximum period of thirty days.
H. At the hearing the registrant or certificate holder licensee against whom
a complaint has been filed shall have the right to cross-examine witnesses against
him, to produce witnesses in his defense, and to appear personally or by counsel.
I. If the accused person or business entity firm fails or refuses to appear, the
board may proceed to hear and determine the validity of the charges.
J. No disciplinary action shall be taken hereunder unless a quorum of the
board is present at the hearing.
K. If the board determines to suspend the certificate of licensure license or
registration of any licensee or registrant or certificate holder, it shall fix the duration
of the period of the suspension. If the board determines to issue a fine against the
registrant or certificate holder licensee, it shall fix the amount of such fine.
L. The executive director of the board shall give written notice of its action
by registered or certified mail, through electronic means, or by personal service
to the registrant or certificate holder licensee against whom the complaint was filed
at his last known address.
M. The board may require the production of books, papers, or other
documents and may issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses to testify
and to produce any relevant books, papers, or other documents in their possession
before the board in any proceeding concerning any violation. The subpoenas shall
be served by the sheriff of the parish or private process server where the witness
Page 20 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 291 ENROLLED
resides or may be found. If any person refuses to obey any subpoena so issued, or
refuses to testify or to produce any books, papers, or other documents required to be
produced, the board may present its petition to the district court of the parish in
which that person was served with the subpoena setting forth the facts. The court
shall then issue a rule to that person requiring him that person to obey the subpoena
or show cause why he that person fails to obey it. Unless that person shall show
sufficient cause for failing to obey the subpoena, the court shall direct him that
person to obey the subpoena and, upon his refusal to comply, he that person shall
be adjudged in contempt of court and punished therefor, as the court may direct.
N. Any registrant or certificate holder licensee who has been subjected to
disciplinary action by the board shall have the right to appeal to the district court of
the parish in which the hearing was held. The appeal shall be governed by the
Administrative Procedure Act R.S. 49:950 et seq. may appeal the board's decision
pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act.
O. The board shall have the power to issue a new certificate of registration
or license, change a revocation to a suspension, or shorten a period of suspension,
or otherwise amend any disciplinary action taken hereunder upon satisfactory
evidence that proper reasons for such action exist. Any person whose certificate of
registration or license has been suspended shall have his certificate of registration or
license automatically reinstated by the board at the end of his period of suspension
upon payment of the renewal fee. No delinquent fee shall be charged for
reinstatement of certificate of registration or license under the provisions of this
Chapter.
§154. Violations and penalties
A. Any The board shall have the power to take enforcement action
against any person, corporation, company, partnership, firm, business entity, or
individual, found by the board to be guilty of any of the following acts:
(1) who shall practice, or offer to practice, Practicing or offering to practice
architecture in this state without being certified registered and licensed in
accordance with the provisions of this Chapter,.
Page 21 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 291 ENROLLED
(2) or any person presenting or attempting Attempting to use as his own the
certificate of registration, license, or the seal of another,.
(3) Engaging in any fraud, deceit, material misstatement, perjury, or
giving any false or forged evidence in taking any examination.
(4) or any person who shall give Giving any false or forged evidence of any
kind to the board, or to any member thereof, in obtaining a certificate of registration,
or a license.
(5) or any person who shall falsely impersonate Falsely impersonating any
other registrant or certificate holder licensee of like or different name,.
(6) or any person who shall attempt Using or attempting to use an expired
or revoked certificate of registration, or license.
(7) Using or attempting to use a seal which is deceptively similar to any
seal authorized by the board for use by a licensee.
(8) Using the title or the words "architect", "architecture", or
"architectural", or any modification or derivative thereof, or displaying or
using any title, sign, advertisement, or other device to indicate that the person
practices or offers to practice architecture, or renders architectural services,
unless the user is duly registered and licensed pursuant to this Chapter.
(9) Falsely claiming that a person is registered or licensed pursuant to
this Chapter.
(10) Violating or failing to comply with any order, ruling, or decision of
the board.
(11) Failing to provide, within thirty calendar days of receipt of a request
by certified or registered mail or personal service, information or documents
requested by the board relating to an alleged violation of this Chapter.
B. or any Any person, applicant, registrant, or certificate holder who shall
violate any of the provisions of this Chapter, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. An
individual who violates any part of this Chapter shall, upon conviction, be sentenced
to pay a fine of not less than three hundred dollars, nor more than fifteen one
thousand five hundred dollars, or be imprisoned for a period not to exceed three
Page 22 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 291 ENROLLED
months, or both. Any person, other than an individual, who violates any provision
of this Chapter shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not less than
fifteen one thousand five hundred dollars, nor more than five thousand dollars. Each
day the violation occurs shall constitute a separate offense.
B.C. It shall be the duty of the attorney general, all district attorneys, and all
duly constituted officers of the law of this state, or any political subdivision thereof,
to enforce the provisions of this Chapter and to prosecute any persons violating the
provisions of this Chapter. The attorney general, or his the attorney general's
assistant, shall act as legal advisor to the board if requested by the board and render
such legal assistance as may be deemed necessary by the board in carrying out the
provisions of this Chapter; however, this shall not relieve the local prosecuting
officers of any duty to prosecute a violation of this Chapter.
C.D.(1)(a) The board shall ensure enforcement of the provisions of this
Chapter. The board may investigate any complaint relating to a violation of this
Chapter and, depending upon the result of its investigation, the board may, after
notice and hearing and by a majority vote of its entire membership authorized to
participate in the proceeding, issue an order prohibiting the person from committing
a violation of this Chapter or fine any such person for any violations of this Chapter,
or both. The fine shall not exceed one thousand five hundred dollars per violation in
the case of an individual or five thousand dollars per violation in the case of a person
other than an individual.
(b) The time and place for said hearing shall be fixed by the board and a copy
of the charges, together with a notice of the time and place of the hearing, shall be
personally served, on or mailed by certified mail, to the last known address of such
person at least thirty days before the date fixed for hearing.
(c) At the hearing, the accused shall have the right to appear in person, or by
counsel, or both, to cross examine cross-examine witnesses in his or its defense, and
to produce evidence and witnesses in his or its defense.
(d) If the accused person or business entity fails or refuses to appear, the
board may proceed to hear and determine the validity of the charges.
Page 23 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 291 ENROLLED
(2) Any person who violates any order of the board issued under pursuant
to this Chapter shall be subject to a civil penalty not in excess of fifteen one
thousand five hundred dollars per violation, in the case of an individual, or five
thousand dollars per violation, in the case of a person other than an individual. If the
penalty imposed is not paid within sixty days after the order becomes final, then the
order shall constitute a judgment and shall be filed and execution issued upon in the
same manner as a judgment of a court of record. Any civil penalty imposed by the
board under pursuant to this Section may, at its discretion, be suspended in whole
or in part.
(3) All funds derived from fines as provided in this Subsection shall be
deposited in the state general fund.
(4) Any person aggrieved by any action of the board in assessing a fine under
pursuant to this Subsection may appeal such action pursuant to the Administrative
Procedure Act.
D.E. In the alternative, after completion of any investigation by the board
concerning a violation of this Chapter by a nonregistrant, the board may present its
findings to the district attorney in whose district the violation occurred and shall aid
in any criminal prosecution for a violation, or the board may, if it deems necessary,
initiate any civil proceeding for a violation of this Chapter directly and in its own
name in any district court. This action may be instituted by any member, officer,
attorney, or agent of the board.
E.F. In addition to any other fine or penalty imposed under pursuant to this
Chapter, the board may assess all reasonable costs incurred in connection with a
disciplinary proceeding, including investigator fees, stenographer fees, and attorney
fees, and court costs against any person found to have violated any order of the board
provision of this Chapter.
* * *
§156. Suits by board; injunction
A. The board shall have the right to go into court in the jurisdiction in which
the provisions of this Chapter are being violated a court of competent jurisdiction
Page 24 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 291 ENROLLED
and, upon affidavit or other proof, secure a temporary restraining order, preliminary
injunction, or permanent injunction restraining and prohibiting any violation of this
Chapter and the performance of any work then being done or about to be commenced
in violation of this Chapter.
B. Any person found guilty of violating any provision of this Chapter in any
such proceeding shall pay to the board a civil penalty in an amount determined by
the court which may include the board's attorneys fees, costs, investigation, and other
expenses, but in no event shall the fine be less than the sum of one thousand dollars.
C. The trial of the proceeding for an injunction shall be summary, with
preference over ordinary proceedings, and tried by a judge without a jury.
D. A violation of an injunction shall be considered as a contempt of court
and punished in accordance with law.
§157. Annual report
The board shall make an annual report to the governor of its transactions,
with any recommendations for the advancement and betterment of the profession
primary activities during the previous calendar year.
§158. Firm practice; licensure; promulgation of rules and regulation
A. All domestic firms and foreign firms qualifying to do business in the state
of Louisiana, which practice or offer to practice architecture in the state of Louisiana
are subject to regulation and supervision by the board, and the board, in
implementation of this Section, may issue rules and regulations further governing the
conduct and activities of such firms.
B. Within thirty days after the issuance by the secretary of state of a
certificate of incorporation of a Louisiana corporation formed pursuant to the
Louisiana Business Corporation Law, R.S. 12:1-101 et seq., the Louisiana Nonprofit
Corporation Law, R.S. 12:201 et seq., or the Louisiana Architectural-Engineering
Corporation Law, R.S. 12:1171 et seq., or the issuance by the secretary of state of a
certificate of organization of a Louisiana limited liability company formed pursuant
to the Louisiana Limited Liability Company Law, R.S. 12:1301 et seq., or the
qualification of a foreign corporation or foreign limited liability company in the state
Page 25 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 291 ENROLLED
of Louisiana which practices or offers to practice architecture in the state of
Louisiana, the firm shall file an application for registration and licensure with the
board on a form provided by the board.
C. Within sixty days after the firm files with the board the application
required above, the board, in the event the firm is otherwise in compliance with the
provisions of this Chapter and the rules and regulations issued by the board
governing firms, shall issue a license. Any firm having been so licensed by the board
shall have the authority to contract to deliver such provide architectural services in
Louisiana, and therefore it shall be subject to disciplinary action as provided in this
Chapter.
Section 2. R.S. 37:146.1 is hereby repealed.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 26 of 26
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.